Nevada, session 83, SB23.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 484B.165 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484B.165 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person shall not, while operating a motor vehicle on a highway in
this State:
(a) Manually type or enter text into a cellular telephone or other
handheld wireless communications device, or send or read data
using any such device to access or search the Internet or to engage
in nonvoice communications with another person, including,
without limitation, texting, electronic messaging and instant
messaging.
(b) Use a cellular telephone or other handheld wireless
communications device to engage in voice communications with
another person, unless the device is used with an accessory which
allows the person to communicate without using his or her hands,
other than to activate, deactivate or initiate a feature or function on
the device.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who
is less than 18 years of age shall not, while operating a motor
vehicle on a highway in this State, use a cellular telephone or
other handheld wireless communications device for any purpose,
including, without limitation, using a cellular telephone or other
handheld wireless communications device to engage in voice
communications, regardless of whether the device is used with an
accessory which allows the person to communicate without using
his or her hands. A peace officer shall not stop a motor vehicle for
the sole purpose of determining whether the driver of the motor
-
*SB23*

– 3 –
vehicle is violating this subsection. A civil infraction citation may
be issued for a violation of this subsection only if the violation is
discovered when the motor vehicle is halted or its driver is arrested
for another alleged violation or offense. This subsection does not
prohibit a peace officer from stopping a motor vehicle for a
suspected violation of subsection 1.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) A paid or volunteer firefighter, emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic,
ambulance attendant or other person trained to provide emergency
medical services who is acting within the course and scope of his or
her employment.
(b) A law enforcement officer or any person designated by a
sheriff or chief of police or the Director of the Department of Public
Safety who is acting within the course and scope of his or her
employment.
(c) A person who is reporting a medical emergency, a safety
hazard or criminal activity or who is requesting assistance relating
to a medical emergency, a safety hazard or criminal activity.
(d) A person who is responding to a situation requiring
immediate action to protect the health, welfare or safety of the
driver or another person and stopping the vehicle would be
inadvisable, impractical or dangerous.
(e) A person who is licensed by the Federal Communications
Commission as an amateur radio operator and who is providing a
communication service in connection with an actual or impending
disaster or emergency, participating in a drill, test, or other exercise
in preparation for a disaster or emergency or otherwise
communicating public information.
(f) An employee or contractor of a public utility who uses a
handheld wireless communications device:
(1) That has been provided by the public utility; and
(2) While responding to a dispatch by the public utility to
respond to an emergency, including, without limitation, a response
to a power outage or an interruption in utility service.
[3.] 4. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the use of
a voice-operated global positioning or navigation system that is
affixed to the vehicle.
[4.] 5. A person who violates any provision of [subsection 1]
this section is guilty of a civil infraction punishable pursuant to
NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, and:
(a) For the first violation within the immediately preceding 7
years, shall pay a civil penalty of $50.
(b) For the second violation within the immediately preceding 7
years, shall pay a civil penalty of $100.
-
*SB23*

– 4 –
(c) For the third or subsequent violation within the immediately
preceding 7 years, shall pay a civil penalty of $250.
[5.] 6. A person who violates any provision of [subsection 1]
this section may be subject to any additional penalty set forth in
NRS 484B.130 or 484B.135.
[6.] 7. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not treat a first
violation of this section in the manner statutorily required for a
moving traffic violation.
[7.] 8. For the purposes of this section, a person shall be
deemed not to be operating a motor vehicle if the motor vehicle is
driven autonomously and the autonomous operation of the motor
vehicle is authorized by law.
[8.] 9. As used in this section:
(a) “Handheld wireless communications device” means a
handheld device for the transfer of information without the use of
electrical conductors or wires and includes, without limitation, a
cellular telephone, a personal digital assistant, a pager and a text
messaging device. The term does not include a device used for two-
way radio communications if:
(1) The person using the device has a license to operate the
device, if required; and
(2) All the controls for operating the device, other than the
microphone and a control to speak into the microphone, are located
on a unit which is used to transmit and receive communications and
which is separate from the microphone and is not intended to be
held.
(b) “Public utility” means a supplier of electricity or natural gas
or a provider of telecommunications service for public use who is
subject to regulation by the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB23*